Washington statutes.
RCW 19.280.040

Investor-owned utilities submit integrated resource plans to the commission—Rules.

(1) Investor-owned utilities shall submit integrated resource plans to the commission. The commission shall establish by rule the requirements for preparation and submission of integrated resource plans.

(2) The commission may adopt additional rules as necessary to clarify the requirements of RCW 19.280.030 as they apply to investor-owned utilities.

[ 2006 c 195 s 4.]